Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2672.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 15-481, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-481. Override election; budget increases; informational pamphlet; notice; ballot; effect A. If a proposed budget of a school district exceeds the aggregate budget limit for the budget year, at least ninety days before the proposed election the governing board shall order an override election to be held on the first Tuesday following the first Monday in November as prescribed by section 16-204, subsection F for the purpose of presenting the proposed budget to the qualified electors of the school district who by a majority of those voting either shall affirm or reject the budget. At the same time as the order of the election, the governing board shall publicly declare the deadline for submitting arguments, as set by the county school superintendent pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 9 of this section, to be submitted in the informational pamphlet and shall immediately post the deadline in a prominent location on the district's website. In addition, the governing board shall prepare an alternate budget that does not include an increase in the budget of more than the amount allowed as provided in section 15-905. If the qualified electors approve the proposed budget, the governing board of the school district shall follow the procedures prescribed in section 15-905 for adopting a budget that includes the authorized increase. If the qualified electors disapprove the proposed budget, the governing board shall follow the procedures prescribed in section 15-905 for adopting a budget that does not include the proposed increase or the portion of the proposed increase that exceeds the amount authorized by a previously approved budget increase as prescribed in subsection P of this section. B. The county school superintendent shall prepare an informational pamphlet on the proposed increase in the budget and a sample ballot and, at least forty days before the election, shall transmit the informational pamphlet and the sample ballot to the governing board of the school district. The governing board, on receipt of the informational pamphlet and the ballot, shall mail or distribute the informational pamphlet and the ballot to the households in which qualified electors reside within the school district at least thirty-five days before the election. Any distribution of material concerning the proposed increase in the budget shall not be conducted by children enrolled in the school district. The informational pamphlet shall contain the following information: 1. The date of the election. 2. The voter's polling place and the times it is open. 3. The proposed total increase in the budget that exceeds the amount allowed pursuant to section 15-905. 4. The total amount of the current year's budget, the total amount of the proposed budget and the total amount of the alternate budget. 5. If the override is for a period of more than one year, a statement indicating the number of years the proposed increase in the budget would be in effect and the percentage of the school district's revenue control limit that the district is requesting for the future years. 6. The proposed total amount of revenues that will fund the increase in the budget and the amount that will be obtained from a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district for the first year for which the budget increase was adopted. 7. The proposed amount of revenues that will fund the increase in the budget and that will be obtained from other than a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district for the first year for which the budget increase was adopted. 8. The dollar amount and the purpose for which the proposed increase in the budget is to be expended for the first year for which the budget increase was adopted. The purpose statement shall only present factual information in a neutral manner. Advocacy for the expenditures is strictly limited to the arguments submitted pursuant to paragraph 9 of this subsection. 9. At least two arguments, if submitted, but not more than ten arguments for and two arguments, if submitted, but not more than ten arguments against the proposed increase in the budget. The arguments shall be in a form prescribed by the county school superintendent, and each argument shall not exceed two hundred words. Arguments for the proposed increase in the budget shall be provided in writing and signed by the governing board. The ballot arguments for the proposed increase in the budget shall be signed as the governing board of the school district without listing any member's individual name for the arguments for the proposed increase. If submitted, additional arguments in favor of the proposed increase in the budget shall be provided in writing with a signed, sworn statement by those in favor. Arguments against the proposed increase in the budget shall be provided in writing with a signed, sworn statement by those in opposition. If the argument is submitted by an organization, it shall contain the sworn statement of two executive officers of the organization. If the argument is submitted by a political committee, it shall contain the sworn statement of the committee's chairperson or treasurer. If the argument is submitted by an individual and not on behalf of an organization, a political committee or any other group, the person shall submit the argument with a sworn, notarized statement. The names of persons and entities submitting written arguments shall be included in the informational pamphlet. Persons signing the argument shall identify themselves by giving their residence address and telephone number, which may not appear in the informational pamphlet, except that the person's city or town and state of residence shall appear in the pamphlet. Any argument that is submitted and that does not comply with this paragraph may not be included in the pamphlet. The county school superintendent shall review all factual statements contained in the written arguments and correct any inaccurate statements of fact. The superintendent shall not review and correct any portion of the written arguments that are identified as statements of the author's opinion. The county school superintendent shall make the written arguments available to the public as provided in title 39, chapter 1, article 2. A deadline for submitting arguments to be included in the informational pamphlet shall be set by the county school superintendent. 10. A statement that the alternate budget shall be adopted by the governing board if the proposed budget is not adopted by the qualified electors of the school district. 11. The current limited property value and the net assessed valuation provided by the department of revenue, the first year tax rate for the proposed override and the estimated amount of the secondary property taxes if the proposed budget is adopted for each of the following: (a) An owner-occupied residence whose assessed valuation is the average assessed valuation of property classified as class three, as prescribed by section 42-12003 for the current year in the school district. (b) An owner-occupied residence whose assessed valuation is one-half of the assessed valuation of the residence in subdivision (a) of this paragraph. (c) An owner-occupied residence whose assessed valuation is twice the assessed valuation of the residence in subdivision (a) of this paragraph. (d) A business whose assessed valuation is the average of the assessed valuation of property classified as class one, as prescribed by section 42-12001, paragraphs 12 and 13 for the current year in the school district. 12. If the election is conducted pursuant to subsection L or M of this section, the following information: (a) An executive summary of the school district's most recent capital improvement plan submitted to the school facilities oversight board. (b) A complete list of each proposed capital improvement that will be funded with the budget increase and a description of the proposed cost of each improvement, including a separate aggregation of capital improvements for administrative purposes as defined by the school facilities oversight board. (c) The tax rate associated with each of the proposed capital improvements and the estimated cost of each capital improvement for the owner of a single family home that is valued at $80,000. C. For the purpose of this section, the school district may use its staff, equipment, materials, buildings or other resources only to distribute the informational pamphlet at the school district office or at public hearings and to produce such information as required in subsection B of this section.  This subsection does not preclude school districts from holding or participating in any public hearings at which testimony is given by at least one person for the proposed increase and one person against the proposed increase. Any written information provided by the district pertaining to the override election shall include financial information showing the estimated first year tax rate for the proposed budget override amount. D. If any amount of the proposed increase will be funded by a levy of taxes in the district, the election prescribed in subsection A of this section shall be held on the first Tuesday following the first Monday in November as prescribed by section 16-204, subsection F. If the proposed increase will be fully funded by revenues from other than a levy of taxes, the elections prescribed in subsection A of this section shall be held on any date prescribed by section 16-204. The elections shall be conducted as nearly as practicable in the manner prescribed in article 1 of this chapter, sections 15-422, through 15-423, 15-424 and section 15-426, relating to special elections, except that: 1. The notices required pursuant to section 15-403 shall be posted not less than twenty-five days before the election. 2. Ballots shall be counted pursuant to title 16, chapter 4, article 10. E. If the election is to exceed the revenue control limit and if the proposed increase will be fully funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget increase, yes" and "budget increase, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice. The ballot shall also contain the amount of the proposed increase of the proposed budget over the alternate budget, a statement that the amount of the proposed increase will be based on a percentage of the school district's revenue control limit in future years, if applicable, as provided in subsection P of this section and the following statement: Any budget increase authorized by this election shall be entirely funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property within this school district for the year for which adopted and for ____ subsequent years, shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state and shall not be subject to the limitation on taxes specified in article IX, section 18, Constitution of Arizona. Based on the current net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes, to fund the proposed increase in the school district's budget would require an estimated tax rate of $_____________ per $100 of net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes and is in addition to the school district's tax rate that will be levied to fund the school district's revenue control limit allowed by law. F. If the election is to exceed the revenue control limit and if the proposed increase will be fully funded by revenues from other than a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget increase, yes" and "budget increase, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice.  The ballot shall also contain: 1. The amount of the proposed increase of the proposed budget over the alternate budget. 2. A statement that the amount of the proposed increase will be based on a percentage of the school district's revenue control limit in future years, if applicable, as provided in subsection P of this section. 3. The following statement: Any budget increase authorized by this election shall be entirely funded by this school district with revenues from other than a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district for the year for which adopted and for ______ subsequent years and shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state. G. Except as provided in subsection H of this section, the maximum budget increase that may be requested and authorized as provided in subsection E or F of this section or the combination of subsections E and F of this section is fifteen percent of the revenue control limit as provided in section 15-947, subsection A for the budget year.  If a school district requests an override pursuant to section 15-482 or to continue with a budget override pursuant to section 15-482 for pupils in kindergarten programs and grades one through three that was authorized before December 31, 2008, the maximum budget increase that may be requested and authorized as provided in subsection E or F of this section or the combination of subsections E and F of this section is ten percent of the revenue control limit as provided in section 15-947, subsection A for the budget year. H. Special budget override provisions for school districts with a student count of less than one hundred fifty-four in kindergarten programs and grades one through eight or with a student count of less than one hundred seventy-six in grades nine through twelve are as follows: 1. The maximum budget increase that may be requested and authorized as provided in subsections E and F of this section is the greater of the amount prescribed in subsection G of this section or a limit computed as follows: (a) For common or unified districts with a student count of less than one hundred fifty-four in kindergarten programs and grades one through eight, the limit computed as prescribed in item (i) or (ii) of this subdivision, whichever is appropriate: (i) Small School   Support Level Weight                  Phase Down Student    Student        for Small Isolated                    Reduction Count     Count Limit    School Districts Base Level    Factor  125 x 1.358 + (0.0005 x     x $ = $ (500  Student Count)) Small Isolated Phase Down     Phase Down              School District Base       Reduction Factor        Elementary Limit $150,000    -  $ = $ (ii) Small School   Support Level Weight                  Phase Down Student    Student        for Small                             Reduction Count     Count Limit    School Districts        Base Level    Factor  125 x 1.278 + (0.0003 x     x $ = $ (500 - Student Count)) Small Phase Down     Phase Down                School District Base       Reduction Factor          Elementary Limit $150,000      $ =  $ (b) For unified or union high school districts with a student count of less than one hundred seventy-six in grades nine through twelve, the limit computed as prescribed in item (i) or (ii) of this subdivision, whichever is appropriate: (i) Small School   Support Level Weight                  Phase Down Student    Student        for Small Isolated                    Reduction Count     Count Limit    School Districts Base Level    Factor  100 x 1.468 + (0.0005 x     x $ = $ __ (500  Student Count)) Small Isolated Phase Down     Phase Down                District Base       Reduction Factor          Secondary Limit $350,000      $ =  $ (ii) Small School   Support Level Weight                  Phase Down Student    Student        for Small                             Reduction Count     Count Limit    School Districts        Base Level_   Factor  100 x  1.398 + (0.0004 x     x $ = $ (500 - Student Count)) Small Phase Down     Phase Down                School District Base       Reduction Factor          Secondary Limit $350,000      $ =  $ (c) If both subdivisions (a) and (b) of this paragraph apply to a unified school district, its limit for the purposes of this paragraph is the combination of its elementary limit and its secondary limit. (d) If only subdivision (a) or (b) of this paragraph applies to a unified school district, the district's limit for the purposes of this paragraph is the sum of the limit computed as provided in subdivision (a) or (b) of this paragraph plus ten percent of the revenue control limit attributable to those grade levels that do not meet the eligibility requirements of this subsection. If a school district budgets monies outside the revenue control limit pursuant to section 15-949, subsection E or H, the district's limit for the purposes of this paragraph is only the ten percent of the revenue control limit attributable to those grade levels that are not included under section 15-949, subsection E or H. For the purposes of this subdivision, the revenue control limit is separated into elementary and secondary components based on the weighted student count as provided in section 15-971, subsection B, paragraph 2, subdivision (a). 2. If a school district utilizes this subsection to request an override of more than one year, the ballot shall include an estimate of the amount of the proposed increase in the future years in place of the statement that the amount of the proposed increase will be based on a percentage of the school district's revenue control limit in future years, as prescribed in subsections E and F of this section. 3. Notwithstanding subsection P of this section, the maximum period of an override authorized pursuant to this subsection is five years. 4. Subsection P, paragraphs 1 and 2 of this section do not apply to overrides authorized pursuant to this subsection. I. If the election is to exceed the revenue control limit as provided in section 15-482 and if the proposed increase will be fully funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget increase, yes" and "budget increase, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice.  The ballot shall also contain the amount of the proposed increase of the budget over the alternate budget, a statement that the amount of the proposed increase will be based on a percentage of the school district's revenue control limit in future years, if applicable, as provided in subsection Q of this section, and the following statement: Any budget increase authorized by this election shall be entirely funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property within this school district for the year for which adopted and for _____ subsequent years, shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state and shall not be subject to the limitation on taxes specified in article IX, section 18, Constitution of Arizona. Based on the current net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes, to fund the proposed increase in the school district's budget that will be funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property within this school district would require an estimated tax rate of $__________ per $100 of net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes and is in addition to the school district's tax rate that will be levied to fund the school district's revenue control limit allowed by law. J. If the election is to exceed the revenue control limit as provided in section 15-482 and if the proposed increase will be fully funded by revenues other than a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget increase, yes" and "budget increase, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice. The ballot shall also contain the amount of the proposed increase of the proposed budget over the alternate budget, a statement that the amount of the proposed increase will be based on a percentage of the school district's revenue control limit in future years, if applicable, as provided in subsection Q of this section and the following statement: Any budget increase authorized by this election shall be entirely funded by this school district with revenues from other than a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district for the year for which adopted and for _____ subsequent years and shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state. K. The maximum budget increase that may be requested and authorized as provided in subsection I or J of this section, or a combination of both of these subsections, is five percent of the revenue control limit as provided in section 15-947, subsection A for the budget year. For a common school district not within a high school district or a common school district within a high school district that offers instruction in high school subjects as provided in section 15-447, five percent of the revenue control limit means five percent of the revenue control limit attributable to the weighted student count in preschool programs for children with disabilities, kindergarten programs and grades one through eight as provided in section 15-971, subsection B.  For a unified school district, five percent of the revenue control limit means five percent of the revenue control limit attributable to the weighted student count in preschool programs for children with disabilities, kindergarten programs and grades one through twelve. For a union high school district, five percent of the revenue control limit means five percent of the revenue control limit attributable to the weighted student count in grades nine through twelve. L. If the election is to exceed district additional assistance and if the proposed increase will be fully funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget increase, yes" and "budget increase, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice. An election held pursuant to this subsection shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November. The ballot shall also contain the amount of the proposed increase of the proposed budget over the alternate budget and the following statement: Any budget increase authorized by this election shall be entirely funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property within this school district for the year in which adopted and for _____ subsequent years, shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state and shall not be subject to the limitation on taxes specified in article IX, section 18, Constitution of Arizona. Based on the current net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes, to fund the proposed increase in the school district's budget would require an estimated tax rate of $____________ per $100 of net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes and is in addition to the school district's tax rate that will be levied to fund the school district's district additional assistance allowed by law. M. If the election is to exceed district additional assistance and if the proposed increase will be fully funded by revenues from other than a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget increase, yes" and "budget increase, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice.  An election held pursuant to this subsection shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November.  The ballot shall also contain the amount of the proposed increase of the proposed budget over the alternate budget and the following statement: Any budget increase authorized by this election shall be entirely funded by this school district with revenues from other than a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district for the year in which adopted and for ______ subsequent years and shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state. N. If the election is to exceed a combination of the revenue control limit as provided in subsection E or F of this section, the revenue control limit as provided in subsection I or J of this section or district additional assistance as provided in subsection L or M of this section, the ballot shall be prepared so that the voters may vote on each proposed increase separately and shall contain statements required in the same manner as if each proposed increase were submitted separately. O. If the election provides for a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district, at least thirty days before the election, the department of revenue shall provide the school district governing board and the county school superintendent with the current net assessed valuation of the school district. The governing board and the county school superintendent shall use the current net assessed valuation of the school district to translate the amount of the proposed dollar increase in the budget of the school district over that allowed by law into a tax rate figure. P. If the voters in a school district vote to adopt a budget in excess of the revenue control limit as provided in subsection E or F of this section, any additional increase shall be included in the aggregate budget limit for each of the years authorized. Any additional increase shall be excluded from the determination of equalization assistance. The school district governing board, however, may levy on the net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes of the property in the school district the additional increase if adopted under subsection E of this section for the period of one year, two years or five through seven years as authorized.  If an additional increase is approved as provided in subsection F of this section, the school district governing board may only use revenues derived from the school district's prior year's maintenance and operation fund ending cash balance to fund the additional increase.  If a budget increase was previously authorized and will be in effect for the budget year or budget year and subsequent years, as provided in subsection E or F of this section, the governing board may request a new budget increase as provided in the same subsection under which the prior budget increase was adopted, which shall not exceed the maximum amount allowed under subsection G of this section. If the voters in the school district authorize the new budget increase amount, the existing budget increase no longer is in effect. If the voters in the school district do not authorize the budget increase amount, the existing budget increase remains in effect for the time period for which it was authorized. The maximum additional increase authorized as provided in subsection E or F of this section and the additional increase that is included in the aggregate budget limit is based on a percentage of a school district's revenue control limit in future years, if the budget increase is authorized for more than one year. If the additional increase: 1. Is for two years, the proposed increase in the second year is equal to the initial proposed percentage increase. 2. Is for five years or more, the proposed increase is equal to the initial proposed percentage increase in the following years of the proposed increase, except that in the next to last year it is two-thirds of the initial proposed percentage increase and it is one-third of the initial proposed percentage increase in the last year of the proposed increase. Q. If the voters in a school district vote to adopt a budget in excess of the revenue control limit as provided in subsection I or J of this section, any additional increase shall be included in the aggregate budget limit for each of the years authorized. Any additional increase shall be excluded from the determination of equalization assistance. The school district governing board, however, may levy on the net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes of the property in the school district the additional increase if adopted under subsection I of this section for the period of one year, two years or five through seven years as authorized.  If an additional increase is approved as provided in subsection J of this section, the increase may only be budgeted and expended if sufficient monies are available in the maintenance and operation fund of the school district. If a budget increase was previously authorized and will be in effect for the budget year or budget year and subsequent years, as provided in subsection I or J of this section, the governing board may request a new budget increase as provided in the same subsection under which the prior budget increase was adopted that does not exceed the maximum amount permitted under subsection K of this section. If the voters in the school district authorize the new budget increase amount, the existing budget increase no longer is in effect. If the voters in the school district do not authorize the budget increase amount, the existing budget increase remains in effect for the time period for which it was authorized. The maximum additional increase authorized as provided in subsection I or J of this section and the additional increase that is included in the aggregate budget limit is based on a percentage of a school district's revenue control limit in future years, if the budget increase is authorized for more than one year. If the additional increase: 1. Is for two years, the proposed increase in the second year is equal to the initial proposed percentage increase. 2. Is for five years or more, the proposed increase is equal to the initial proposed percentage increase in the following years of the proposed increase, except that in the next to last year it is two-thirds of the initial proposed percentage increase and it is one-third of the initial proposed percentage increase in the last year of the proposed increase. R. If the voters in a school district vote to adopt a budget in excess of district additional assistance as provided in subsection L of this section, any additional increase shall be included in the aggregate budget limit for each of the years authorized. The additional increase shall be excluded from the determination of equalization assistance. The school district governing board, however, may levy on the net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes of the property in the school district the additional increase for the period authorized but not to exceed ten years.  For overrides approved by a vote of the qualified electors of the school district at an election held from and after October 31, 1998, the period of the additional increase prescribed in this subsection shall not exceed seven years for any capital override election. S. If the voters in a school district vote to adopt a budget in excess of district additional assistance as provided in subsection M of this section, any additional increase shall be included in the aggregate budget limit for each of the years authorized. The additional increase shall be excluded from the determination of equalization assistance. The school district governing board may only use revenues derived from the school district's prior year's maintenance and operation fund ending cash balance and capital outlay fund ending cash balance to fund the additional increase for the period authorized but not to exceed ten years. For overrides approved by a vote of the qualified electors of the school district at an election held from and after October 31, 1998, the period of the additional increase prescribed in this subsection shall not exceed seven years for any capital override election. T. In addition to subsections P and S of this section, from the maintenance and operation fund and capital outlay fund ending cash balances, the school district governing board shall first use any available revenues to reduce its primary tax rate to zero and shall use any remaining revenues to fund the additional increase authorized as provided in subsections F and M of this section. U. If the voters in a school district disapprove the proposed budget, the alternate budget that, except for any budget increase authorized by a prior election, does not include an increase in the budget in excess of the amount provided in section 15-905 shall be adopted by the governing board as provided in section 15-905. V. The governing board may request that any override election be cancelled if any change in chapter 9 of this title changes the amount of the aggregate budget limit as provided in section 15-905.  The request to cancel the override election shall be made to the county school superintendent at least eighty days before the date of the scheduled override election. W. For any election conducted pursuant to subsection L or M of this section: 1. The ballot shall include the following statement in addition to any other statement required by this section: The capital improvements that are proposed to be funded through this override election are to exceed the state standards and are in addition to monies provided by the state. ___________ school district is proposing to increase its budget by $__________ to fund capital improvements over and above those funded by the state. Under the students first capital funding system, _________ school district is entitled to state monies for new construction and renovation of school buildings in accordance with state law. 2. The ballot shall contain the words "budget increase, yes" and "budget increase, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice. 3. At least eighty-five days before the election, the school district shall submit proposed ballot language to the director of the Arizona legislative council. The director of the Arizona legislative council shall review the proposed ballot language to determine whether the proposed ballot language complies with this section. If the director of the Arizona legislative council determines that the proposed ballot language does not comply with this section, the director, within ten calendar days after receiving the proposed ballot language, shall notify the school district of the director's objections, and the school district shall resubmit revised ballot language to the director for approval. X. If the voters approve the budget increase pursuant to subsection L or M of this section, the school district shall not use the override proceeds for any purposes other than the proposed capital improvements listed in the informational pamphlet, except that up to ten percent of the override proceeds may be used for general capital expenses, including cost overruns of proposed capital improvements. Y. Each school district that currently increases its budget pursuant to this section shall hold a public meeting each year between September 1 and October 31 at which an update of the programs or capital improvements financed through the override is discussed and at which the public is allowed an opportunity to comment and: 1. If the increase is pursuant to subsection L or M of this section, at a minimum, the update shall include the progress of capital improvements financed through the override, a comparison of the current status and the original projections on the construction of capital improvements, the costs of capital improvements and the costs of capital improvements in progress or completed since the prior meeting and the future capital plans of the school district. The school district shall include in the public meeting a discussion of the school district's use of state capital aid and voter-approved bonding in funding capital improvements, if any. 2. If the increase is pursuant to subsection E, F, I or J of this section, the update shall include at a minimum the amount expended in the previous fiscal year and the amount included in the current budget for each of the purposes listed in the informational pamphlet prescribed by subsection B of this section. Z. If a budget in excess of district additional assistance was previously adopted by the voters in a school district and will be in effect for the budget year or budget year and subsequent years, as provided in subsection L or M of this section, the governing board may request an additional budget in excess of district additional assistance. If the voters in a school district authorize the additional budget in excess of district additional assistance, the existing district additional assistance budget increase remains in effect. AA. Notwithstanding any other law, the maximum budget increase that may be authorized pursuant to subsection L or M of this section is ten percent of the school district's revenue control limit. BB. If the election is to continue to exceed the revenue control limit and if the proposed override will be fully funded by a continuation of a levy of taxes on the taxable property in the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget override continuation, yes" and "budget override continuation, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice.  The ballot shall also contain the amount of the proposed continuation of the budget increase of the proposed budget over the alternate budget, a statement that the amount of the proposed increase will be based on a percentage of the school district's revenue control limit in future years, if applicable, as provided in subsection P of this section and the following statement: Any budget increase continuation authorized by this election shall be entirely funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property in this school district for the year for which adopted and for _______ subsequent years, shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state and shall not be subject to the limitation on taxes specified in article IX, section 18, Constitution of Arizona. Based on the current net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes, to fund the proposed continuation of the increase in the school district's budget would require an estimated continuation of a tax rate of $______________ per $100 of assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes and is in addition to the school district's tax rate that will be levied to fund the school district's revenue control limit allowed by law. CC. If the election is to continue to exceed the revenue control limit as provided in section 15-482 and if the proposed override will be fully funded by a continuation of a levy of taxes on the taxable property in the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget override continuation, yes" and "budget override continuation, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice.  The ballot shall also contain the amount of the proposed continuation of the budget increase of the proposed budget over the alternate budget, a statement that the amount of the proposed increase will be based on a percentage of the school district's revenue control limit in future years, if applicable, as provided in subsection P of this section and the following statement: Any budget increase continuation authorized by this election shall be entirely funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property in this school district for the year for which adopted and for ______ subsequent years, shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state and shall not be subject to the limitation on taxes specified in article IX, section 18, Constitution of Arizona. Based on the current net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes, to fund the proposed continuation of the increase in the school district's budget would require an estimated continuation of a tax rate of $______________ per $100 of net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes and is in addition to the school district's tax rate that will be levied to fund the school district's revenue control limit allowed by law. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 15-949, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-949. Small school districts; exemption from general budget limit; budget revision A. The governing board of a common school district with a student count in kindergarten programs and grades one through eight of one hundred twenty-five or less, the governing board of a high school district with a student count of one hundred or less or the governing board of a unified school district or the county school superintendent for an accommodation school with a student count of one hundred twenty-five or less in kindergarten programs and grades one through eight or with a student count of one hundred or less in grades nine through twelve shall compute a revenue control limit and a general budget limit, but the governing board or the county school superintendent may: 1. Adopt a budget in excess of the general budget limit without the necessity of an election under section 15-481, provided that for a unified school district or for an accommodation school the excess amount of expenditures shall be attributable to the student count in kindergarten programs and grades one through eight or to the student count in grades nine through twelve as provided in this subsection. 2. Revise its budget to include the costs for additional pupils who were not anticipated when the budget was adopted, if it receives permission as follows: (a) If a governing board: (i) The governing board shall send a petition to the county school superintendent requesting authority to revise its budget. The petition shall and include a copy of the proposed budget in the petition. (ii) The county school superintendent shall recommend the action to be taken on the petition and forward the recommendation and the petition to the board of supervisors. (iii) The board of supervisors shall hold a hearing on the petition within twenty days after receipt of the petition and shall determine whether to allow the petition, allow the petition after revision or deny the petition. (b) If a county school superintendent, the county school superintendent shall send the revised budget to the board of supervisors, and the board of supervisors shall hold a hearing on the recommendation within twenty days after receipt of the recommendation and shall determine whether to allow the revised budget, allow the revised budget after further revision or deny the revision. B. If the board of supervisors revises or denies the petition or recommendation presented pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 2, subdivision (a), item (iii) or subdivision (b) of this section, the board shall state the reasons for revision or denial in writing. C. School districts that in any year after fiscal year 1984-1985 but before fiscal year 1999-2000 have operated under the provisions of the small school adjustment as provided for in subsection A of this section and that have subsequently exceeded the student count limits expressed in subsection A of this section may continue in successive years to adopt a budget greater than the general budget limit without the necessity of an election under section 15-481, except that the amount greater than adopted budget may not exceed the general budget limit shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars by an amount that is greater than $50,000. The amount that is adopted without the use of an election under section 15-481 and that is greater than the general budget limit is specifically exempt from the revenue control limit. D. Notwithstanding subsection C of this section, school districts that exceeded the student count limits prescribed in subsection A of this section may adopt, in the first year that these limits are exceeded, a budget that exceeds the general budget limit without an election conducted pursuant to section 15-481 or pursuant to subsection E of this section, except that the amount that exceeds adopted budget may not exceed the general budget limit shall not exceed the by an amount that is greater than the amount authorized pursuant to subsection C of this section plus the limit prescribed in subsection E of this section.  The amount that is adopted without an election and that exceeds the general budget limit is exempt from the revenue control limit. E. School districts that in any year after fiscal year 1998-1999 have operated under the provisions of the small school adjustment as provided in subsection A of this section and that have subsequently exceeded the student count limits prescribed in subsection A of this section may continue in successive years to adopt a budget greater than the general budget limit subject to an election, except that the amount that is greater than adopted budget may not exceed the general budget limit shall not exceed by an amount that is greater than the amount that is prescribed in this subsection.  The amount that is adopted pursuant to this subsection is specifically exempt from the revenue control limit and shall be funded by a levy on secondary property taxes in the school district.  The maximum amount that may be adopted pursuant to this subsection is computed as follows: 1. For a unified school district, separate the revenue control limit into elementary and secondary components based on the weighted student count as provided in section 15-971, subsection B, paragraph 2, subdivision (a).  Use the elementary component of the revenue control limit for the purposes of paragraph 2 of this subsection and the secondary component of the revenue control limit for the purposes of paragraph 3 of this subsection. 2. For a common or unified district that used the provisions of subsection A of this section based on its elementary student count, the amount is determined as follows: (a) Subtract one hundred twenty-five from the elementary student count. (b) Multiply the difference in subdivision (a) of this paragraph by 0.45 percent. (c) Subtract the product determined in subdivision (b) of this paragraph from thirty-five percent.  If the result is zero or less than zero, the district is not eligible to use the provisions of this paragraph. (d) Multiply the difference determined in subdivision (c) of this paragraph by the elementary revenue control limit. 3. For a high school or unified district that used the provisions of subsection A of this section based on its secondary student count, the amount is determined as follows: (a) Subtract one hundred from the secondary student count. (b) Multiply the difference in subdivision (a) of this paragraph by 0.65 percent. (c) Subtract the product determined in subdivision (b) of this paragraph from sixty-five percent.  If the result is zero or less than zero, the district is not eligible to use the provisions of this paragraph. (d) Multiply the difference determined in subdivision (c) of this paragraph by the secondary revenue control limit. 4. For a unified school district that used the provisions of subsection A of this section for both its elementary and secondary pupils, combine the amounts determined in paragraphs 2 and 3 of this subsection. F. For the purposes of subsection E of this section: 1. "Elementary" means kindergarten programs and grades one through eight. 2. "Secondary" means grades nine through twelve. G. The governing board of a school district with a student count in grades one through twelve of at least one hundred TWENTY-FIVE but less than two hundred shall compute a revenue control limit and a general budget limit, but the governing board may send a petition to the county school superintendent requesting authority to adopt a budget in excess of the general budget limit without an election under section 15-481. The governing board shall include a copy of the school district's proposed budget in any petition that the governing board sends pursuant to this subsection.  The county school superintendent shall forward the petition to the county board of supervisors.  The board of supervisors shall hold a hearing on the petition within twenty days after receiving the petition and shall determine whether to either allow the petition, allow the petition after revision or deny the petition.  If the board of supervisors revises or denies the petition presented pursuant to this subsection, the board of supervisors shall state the reasons for revision or denial in writing. A county board of supervisors may not authorize a school district to adopt a budget pursuant to this subsection that exceeds the school district's general budget limit by more than: 1. Two hundred percent for a school district with a student count of at least one hundred twenty-five but less than one hundred fifty. 2. One hundred seventy-five percent of the general budget limit for a school district with a student count of at least one hundred fifty but less than one hundred seventy-five. 3. One hundred fifty percent for a school district with a student count of at least one hundred seventy-five but less than two hundred. H. School districts that have operated under the budget excess provisions of subsection G of this section and that have a student count of at least two hundred but not more than two hundred fifty may continue to adopt a budget greater than the general budget limit in successive years, subject to an election, except that the adopted budget may not exceed the school district's general budget limit by more than one hundred twenty-five percent.  The amount of a school district's adopted budget that exceeds the general budget limit pursuant to this subsection is specifically exempt from the revenue control limit and shall be funded by a levy on secondary property taxes in the school district. G. I. The part of the primary tax rate set to fund the small school district adjustment as provided in subsections D, and E and H of this section shall not be included in the computation of additional state aid for education as prescribed in section 15-972. H. J. The election required pursuant to subsection E or H of this section shall conform to the procedural requirements for calling the election, preparing the informational pamphlet and preparing the ballot as prescribed in section 15-481, subsections A, B, C and D.  The maximum number of years that a budget override approved pursuant to subsection E of this section may be in effect is five years. I. k. If the proposed budget override will be fully funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget override increase continuation, yes" and "budget override increase continuation, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice.  The ballot shall also contain the amount of the proposed budget override compared to the amount the school district budgeted in the preceding year and the amount the school district would be allowed to budget for if the measure is not approved by the voters.  The statement shall also include the estimated amount of the override for each year the override is sought.  The ballot shall also include the following statement: 1. For an election required by subsection E of this section: The budget override authorized by this election allows the _______________ school district to levy property taxes in excess of the property tax levy allowed by law to fund the school district's revenue control limit.  The property tax levy for the year for which adopted and for ____ subsequent years will be annually adjusted based on a formula that authorizes the _______________ school district to exceed the revenue control limit by up to thirty-five percent for kindergarten programs and grades one through eight or up to sixty-five percent for grades nine through twelve.  The levy shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state and shall not be subject to the limitation on taxes specified in article IX, section 18, Constitution of Arizona. Based on an estimate of assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes, the proposed override in the ________________ school district's budget over that allowed by the revenue control limit would result in an estimated increase in the school district's tax rate of $_________________ dollars per one hundred dollars $100 of assessed valuation for the secondary property tax purposes. 2. For an election required by subsection H of this section: The budget override authorized by this election allows the _______________ school district to levy property taxes in excess of the property tax levy allowed by law to fund the school district's revenue control limit.  The property tax levy for the year for which adopted and for ____ subsequent years will be annually adjusted based on a formula that authorizes the _______________ school district to exceed the revenue control limit by up to twenty-five percent.  The levy shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state and shall not be subject to the limitation on taxes specified in article IX, section 18, Constitution of Arizona.  Based on an estimate of assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes, the proposed override in the ________________ school district's budget over that allowed by the revenue control limit would result in an estimated increase in the school district's tax rate of $_________________ per $100 of assessed valuation for the secondary property tax purposes. J. L. If the proposed budget override will be fully funded by revenues from other than a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget override increase continuation, yes" and "budget override increase continuation, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice.  The ballot shall also contain the amount of the proposed budget override compared to the amount the school district budgeted in the preceding year and the amount the school district would be allowed to budget for if the measure is not approved by the voters.  The statement shall also include the estimated amount of the override for each year the override is sought. The ballot shall also include the following statement: Any budget override authorized by this election shall be entirely funded by this school district with revenues from other than a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district for the year for which adopted and for ______ subsequent years and shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state. K. M. For the purposes of subsections H  j and I  k of this section, levy of taxes on the taxable property does not include a levy of the government property lease or park property lease excise taxes assessed pursuant to title 42, chapter 6, article 5. END_STATUTE